en: Vehicle safety equipment position: Chassis/frame; Exterior: front; Exterior: rear; Exterior: side; Glove box/center console; Interior: cargo area; Interior: front; Interior: rear; Roof/roll-over structure; Trunk/boot; Wheel/tire area; Window/door opening; Other
it: Posizione delle attrezzature di sicurezza del veicolo: Telaio/struttura; Esterno: anteriore; Esterno: posteriore; Esterno: laterale; Cassetto portaoggetti/console centrale; Interno: vano di carico; Interno: anteriore; Interno: posteriore; Tetto/struttura antiribaltamento; Bagagliaio; Area ruota/pneumatico; Apertura finestrino/porta; Altro
hr-HR: Položaj sigurnosne opreme vozila: Šasija/okvir; Izvana: sprijeda; Izvana: straga; Izvana: sa strane; Pretinac za rukavice / središnja konzola; Iznutra: teretni prostor; Iznutra: sprijeda; Iznutra: straga; Krov / struktura za zaštitu pri prevrtanju; Prtljažnik; Područje kotača/guma; Otvor prozora/vrata; Ostalo
pl: Położenie wyposażenia bezpieczeństwa pojazdu: Podwozie/rama; Zewnątrz: przód; Zewnątrz: tył; Zewnątrz: bok; Schowek/konsola środkowa; Wnętrze: przestrzeń bagażowa; Wnętrze: przód; Wnętrze: tył; Dach/konstrukcja antykapotażowa; Bagażnik; Okolice kół/opon; Otwór okienny/drzwiowy; Inne
pt-BR: Equipamento de segurança veicular posição: Chassi/estrutura; Exterior: dianteira; Exterior: traseira; Exterior: lateral; Porta-luvas/console central; Interior: área de carga; Interior: dianteira; Interior: traseira; Teto/estrutura anticapotamento; Porta-malas; Área da roda/pneu; Abertura de janela/porta; Outro
vi: Vị trí thiết bị an toàn xe: Khung gầm/khung xe; Ngoại thất: phía trước; Ngoại thất: phía sau; Ngoại thất: bên hông; Hộp đựng găng tay/bảng điều khiển trung tâm; Nội thất: khu vực chở hàng; Nội thất: phía trước; Nội thất: phía sau; Mái/cấu trúc chống lật; Cốp xe/khoang hành lý; Khu vực bánh xe/lốp; Lỗ cửa sổ/cửa ra vào; Khác
sv: Placering av fordonssäkerhetsutrustning: Chassi/ram; Exteriör: fram; Exteriör: bak; Exteriör: sida; Handskfack/mittkonsol; Interiör: lastutrymme; Interiör: fram; Interiör: bak; Tak/överrullningsskydd; Bagageutrymme; Hjul-/däckområde; Fönster-/dörröppning; Övrigt
tr: Araç güvenlik ekipmanı konumu: Şasi/iskelet; Dış: ön; Dış: arka; Dış: yan; Torpido gözü/orta konsol; İç: kargo alanı; İç: ön; İç: arka; Tavan/devrilme koruma yapısı; Bagaj; Tekerlek/lastik alanı; Pencere/kapı açıklığı; Diğer
zh-CN: 车辆安全设备位置: 底盘/车架; 外部：前; 外部：后; 外部：侧; 手套箱/中控台; 内部：后备箱; 内部：前; 内部：后; 车顶/防翻滚结构; 后备箱; 车轮/轮胎区域; 窗/门洞; 其他
fi: Ajoneuvon turvavarusteiden sijainti: Alusta/runko; Ulkopuoli: etuosa; Ulkopuoli: takaosa; Ulkopuoli: sivu; Hansikaslokero / keskikonsoli; Sisäpuoli: tavaratila; Sisäpuoli: etuosa; Sisäpuoli: takaosa; Katto / ympäripyörähdyssuoja; Tavaratila; Pyörän/renkaan alue; Ikkunan/oven aukko; Muu
ko: 차량 안전 장비 위치: 섀시/프레임; 외부: 전면; 외부: 후면; 외부: 측면; 글로브 박스/센터 콘솔; 내부: 적재 공간; 내부: 전면; 내부: 후면; 루프/롤오버 구조; 트렁크/부트; 휠/타이어 영역; 창문/도어 오프닝; 기타
ja: 車両用安全装置位置: シャーシ / フレーム; 外装: フロント; 外装: リア; 外装: サイド; グローブボックス / センターコンソール; 内装: 荷室; 内装: フロント; 内装: リア; ルーフ / ロールオーバーストラクチャー; トランク / ブーツ; ホイール / タイヤ周り; 窓 / ドア開口部; その他
es: Posición del equipo de seguridad del vehículo: Chasis/bastidor; Exterior: parte delantera; Exterior: parte trasera; Exterior: lateral; Guantera/consola central; Interior: área de carga; Interior: parte delantera; Interior: parte trasera; Techo/estructura antivuelco; Maletero/baúl; Área de la rueda/neumático; Abertura de ventana/puerta; Otro
bg-BG: Позиция на автомобилното предпазно оборудване: Шаси/рама; Екстериор: отпред; Екстериор: отзад; Екстериор: отстрани; Жабка/централна конзола; Интериор: товарна зона; Интериор: отпред; Интериор: отзад; Покрив/защитна структура при преобръщане; Багажник; Зона на колелата/гумите; Отваряне на прозорец/врата; Друго
pt-PT: Posição do equipamento de segurança do veículo: Chassis/quadro; Exterior: frente; Exterior: traseira; Exterior: lateral; Porta-luvas/consola central; Interior: área de carga; Interior: frente; Interior: traseira; Tejadilho/estrutura anticapotamento; Mala/bagageira; Área da roda/pneu; Abertura de porta/janela; Outro
fr: Emplacement de l’équipement de sécurité du véhicule: Châssis/cadre; Extérieur : avant; Extérieur : arrière; Extérieur : côté; Boîte à gants/console centrale; Intérieur : espace de chargement; Intérieur : avant; Intérieur : arrière; Toit/arceau de sécurité; Coffre; Passage de roue; Ouverture de fenêtre/porte; Autre
sl-SI: Položaj varnostne opreme v vozilu: Šasija/okvir; Zunanjost: spredaj; Zunanjost: zadaj; Zunanjost: ob strani; Predal pred sovoznikom/sredinska konzola; Notranjost: prtljažni prostor; Notranjost: spredaj; Notranjost: zadaj; Streha/zaščita pri prevrnitvi; Prtljažnik; Območje koles/pnevmatik; Odprtina okna/vrat; Drugo
cs: Umístění bezpečnostního vybavení vozidla: Podvozek/rám; Exteriér: vpředu; Exteriér: vzadu; Exteriér: na boku; Přihrádka v palubní desce / středová konzola; Interiér: nákladový prostor; Interiér: vpředu; Interiér: vzadu; Střecha / ochranný rám; Kufr; Oblast kol/pneumatik; Okenní/dveřní otvor; Jiné
nl: Voertuig veiligheidsuitrusting positie: Chassis/frame; Buitenkant: voorkant; Buitenkant: achterkant; Buitenkant: zijkant; Dashboardkastje/middenconsole; Binnenkant: laadruimte; Binnenkant: voorkant; Binnenkant: achterkant; Dak/rolbeugel; Kofferbak; Wiel-/bandengedeelte; Raam-/deuropening; Overige
nb: Plassering av kjøretøyets sikkerhetsutstyr: Chassis/ramme; Eksteriør: foran; Eksteriør: bak; Eksteriør: side; Hanskerom/midtkonsoll; Interiør: lasterom; Interiør: foran; Interiør: bak; Tak/veltebøyle; Bagasjerom; Hjul-/dekkområde; Vindu-/døråpning; Annet
th: ตำแหน่งอุปกรณ์ความปลอดภัยของยานพาหนะ: แชสซี/โครงรถ; ภายนอก: ด้านหน้า; ภายนอก: ด้านหลัง; ภายนอก: ด้านข้าง; ช่องเก็บของ/คอนโซลกลาง; ภายใน: พื้นที่บรรทุกสัมภาระ; ภายใน: ด้านหน้า; ภายใน: ด้านหลัง; หลังคา/โครงสร้างกันการพลิกคว่ำ; กระโปรงหลัง; บริเวณล้อ/ยาง; ช่องหน้าต่าง/ประตู; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Poziția echipamentului de siguranță auto: Șasiu / cadru; Exterior: față; Exterior: spate; Exterior: lateral; Torpedou / consolă centrală; Interior: zonă de marfă; Interior: față; Interior: spate; Plafon / structură de protecție la răsturnare; Portbagaj; Zonă roți / anvelope; Deschidere fereastră / ușă; Altele
de: Position der Fahrzeugsicherheitsausrüstung: Fahrgestell/Rahmen; Außen: vorne; Außen: hinten; Außen: seitlich; Handschuhfach/Mittelkonsole; Innen: Laderaum; Innen: vorne; Innen: hinten; Dach/Überrollbügel; Kofferraum; Rad-/Reifenbereich; Fenster-/Türöffnung; Sonstiges
da: Placering af sikkerhedsudstyr i køretøj: Chassis/ramme; Udvendig: Foran; Udvendig: Bagpå; Udvendig: Side; Handskerum/midterkonsol; Indvendig: Lastrum; Indvendig: Foran; Indvendig: Bagpå; Tag/styrtbøjlekonstruktion; Bagagerum; Hjul-/dækområde; Vindue/døråbning; Andet
ru: Положение автомобильного оборудования безопасности: Шасси/рама; Снаружи: спереди; Снаружи: сзади; Снаружи: сбоку; Бардачок/центральная консоль; Внутри: багажное отделение; Внутри: спереди; Внутри: сзади; Крыша/дуга безопасности; Багажник; Колесо/зона шины; Проем окна/двери; Другое
el: Θέση εξοπλισμού ασφαλείας οχήματος: Σασί/πλαίσιο; Εξωτερικά: μπροστά; Εξωτερικά: πίσω; Εξωτερικά: πλάι; Ντουλαπάκι/κεντρική κονσόλα; Εσωτερικά: χώρος φόρτωσης; Εσωτερικά: μπροστά; Εσωτερικά: πίσω; Οροφή/δομή προστασίας από ανατροπή; Πορτμπαγκάζ; Περιοχή τροχού/ελαστικού; Άνοιγμα παραθύρου/πόρτας; Άλλο
zh-TW: 車輛安全裝備位置: 底盤/車架; 外部：前方; 外部：後方; 外部：側面; 手套箱/中控台; 內部：載貨區; 內部：前方; 內部：後方; 車頂/防滾結構; 後車廂; 車輪/輪胎區域; 車窗/車門開口; 其他
hu: Járműbiztonsági felszerelés pozíciója: Alváz/váz; Külső: elöl; Külső: hátul; Külső: oldalt; Kesztyűtartó/középkonzol; Belső: raktér; Belső: elöl; Belső: hátul; Tető/borulásvédő keret; Csomagtartó; Kerék/gumiabroncs környéke; Ablak-/ajtónyílás; Egyéb
sk-SK: Umiestnenie bezpečnostného vybavenia vozidla: Podvozok/rám; Exteriér: vpredu; Exteriér: vzadu; Exteriér: zboku; Priehradka v palubnej doske / stredová konzola; Interiér: batožinový priestor; Interiér: vpredu; Interiér: vzadu; Strecha / ochranná konštrukcia pri prevrátení; Kufor; Oblasť kolesa/pneumatiky; Otvor pre okná/dvere; Iné
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės saugos įrangos vieta: Važiuoklė / rėmas; Išorė: priekis; Išorė: galas; Išorė: šonas; Daiktadėžė / centrinė konsolė; Vidus: krovinių skyrius; Vidus: priekis; Vidus: galas; Stogas / apsaugos nuo apvirtimo konstrukcija; Bagažinė; Rato / padangos sritis; Lango / durų anga; Kita